New Mexico, session 2026, HB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] APPLICATIONS FOR RESIDENTIAL BUILDING PERMITS--REPORTING REQUIRED.-- A. Beginning July 1, 2026, a class A county or municipality with a population greater than thirty thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census shall publish a quarterly report on the county's or municipality's website on all residential land use applications and residential building permit applications received and the status of each residential land use application and permit application. The quarterly report shall be submitted to the economic development department and the legislative finance committee and shall include: (1) the total number of residential land use applications received and the total number of dwelling units provided for in each application; (2) the total number of residential land use applications approved and denied during the immediately preceding quarter and the total number of approved and denied dwelling units provided for in those applications; (3) for each residential land use application, the number of business days elapsed from the date the application is submitted to the date the application is deemed complete, and the number of business days elapsed from the date the application is deemed complete to the date the application is approved or denied for all applications approved or denied during the immediately preceding quarter; (4) the total number of new single-family and multifamily residential building permits issued and the total number of planned dwelling units within all multifamily residential buildings for which permits were approved; (5) for each residential building permit, the number of business days elapsed from the date the residential building permit application is submitted to the date the residential building permit application is deemed complete, and the number of business days elapsed from the date the application is deemed complete to the date the residential building permit application is approved or denied for all residential building permit applications approved or denied during the immediately preceding quarter; (6) the total number of full-time equivalent staff assigned to the jurisdiction's planning and land use department or the equivalent during the immediately preceding quarter; and (7) a narrative section for each data point required to allow the class A county or municipality to provide comments related to the data reported if further narrative is required. B. As used in this section, "residential land use application" means a site plan, development plan, rezoning plan, master plan, subdivision plat or equivalent for a residential project of more than three units. SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 3 -